California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The tax collector shall pay the redemption money to the person holding the original certificate of sale and shall require that the person to whom the redemption money is paid surrender the certificate and give a receipt for the money so paid. Upon redemption of any parcel of land the tax collector shall enter the fact and date of redemption upon the duplicate certificate of sale for that parcel of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10417.

If property sold pursuant to this chapter is not redeemed within one year, and if the purchaser or his assignee has complied with the provisions of this chapter, the tax collector shall execute to the person named in the original certificate, or to his assignee on his application, a deed of the property described in the certificate. The deed shall refer in general terms to the proceedings under which it is issued and contain a description of the property, any assignment thereof, and the fact that no person has redeemed the property. The tax collector shall receive from the applicant one dollar ($1) for making the deed, unless the city is the purchaser, in which case no charge shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10418.

At least 30 days before he applies for a deed, the purchaser or his assignee shall serve upon the owner of the property, and upon the occupant of such property if it is occupied, a written notice setting forth:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) That the property has been sold for a delinquent assessment (specifying the improvement for which the assessment was made).

(c) The amount for which the property was sold.

(d) The amount necessary to redeem at the time of giving notice.

(e) The time when the purchaser or assignee will apply to the tax collector for a deed.

If the owner cannot be found, after due diligence, the notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the property, at least 30 days before the time stated therein as the time at which the application for a deed will be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10419.

The person applying for a deed shall file with the tax collector an affidavit or affidavits showing that notice of such application has been given as required in this chapter, and if the notice was not served on the owner of the property personally that due diligence was used to find the owner. The affidavit or affidavits shall be filed by the tax collector in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10420.

If redemption of the property is made after such affidavits are filed, and more than 11 months from the date of sale, the person making the redemption shall pay, in addition to the other amounts required, three dollars ($3) for the service of notice and the making of the affidavits, which amount shall be paid over to the purchaser or his assignee in the same manner as other sums paid for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10421.

No deed for any property sold for delinquent assessment shall be made until the purchaser or his assignee has complied with all the provisions of Sections 10417 to 10420, inclusive, and has filed the proper affidavits with the tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10422.

The deed of the tax collector conveys the title in fee to the property and entitles the grantee, upon the receipt thereof, to immediate possession of the property described in the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10423.

The deed of the tax collector is prima facie evidence of the truth of all the matters which it recites, and of the regularity of all proceedings prior to the execution of the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10424.

As fast as collected the tax collector shall pay the funds collected by him pursuant to this division, either upon voluntary payment or as the result of sales, to the treasurer of the city. The city treasurer shall place the funds so received in a special fund designated by the name of the improvement proceeding. Payment shall be made out of the special fund so established only for the purposes provided for in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

10424.2.

(a) If the Orange County Board of Supervisors determines, subsequent to the issuance of bonds, that the acquisition or construction of all or any part of the proposed improvement will be delayed beyond the date upon which, at the time the bonds were issued, the acquisition or construction was expected to occur, the balance then on deposit in the improvement fund, or the portion specified by the board, may, at the direction of the board, be applied to call outstanding bonds called for redemption. The call and redemption of bonds pursuant to this section shall not cause the amount of any assessment to be reduced. The board shall cause any annual assessment installments occurring after any redemption under this section to be reduced to the maximum extent permitted by law.

(b) The board may, from time to time, issue bonds in an aggregate principal amount not in excess of the principal amount of bonds called for redemption pursuant to subdivision (a). The net proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds shall be deposited in the improvement fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 650, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10425.

If the first assessment or the sale of bonds to represent assessments levied pursuant to this division fails to raise sufficient money to pay all costs, damages, and expenses of the improvement or acquisition, including any judgments rendered in the action and proceedings mentioned in this division and the costs and expenses thereof, the legislative body may pay the deficit out of the general fund, or may order a supplemental assessment to pay the deficit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10426.

The supplemental assessment shall be made and collected in the same manner, as nearly as may be, as the first assessment. Subsequent supplemental assessments may be made, if necessary, to pay for the improvement. At the hearing the legislative body may confirm, modify, or correct the supplemental assessment. The decision of the legislative body thereon is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10427.

After completion of the improvement and the payment of all claims from the improvement fund, the legislative body shall determine the amount of the surplus, if any, remaining in the improvement fund by reason of the assessment and any supplemental assessment levied for the improvement. The surplus shall be used, in amounts determined by the legislative body, for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) For transfer to the general fund of the city, provided that the amount transferred shall not exceed the lesser of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or 5 percent of the total amount expended from the improvement fund. 

(b) As a credit upon the assessment and any supplemental assessment, in the manner provided in Section 10427.1. 

(c) For the maintenance of the improvement. 

(d) To call bonds, thereby reducing outstanding assessments and subsequent assessment installments. In the event that the legislative body determines to use all or some portion of the surplus to call bonds prior to maturity, the treasurer shall do each of the following:

(1) Cause the special reserve fund, if any, to be reduced as necessary pursuant to Section 8887 to assure that the bonds will not become subject to federal income taxation. 

(2) Cause any assessment previously paid in cash to receive a credit in cash pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10427.1 for the proportionate share of the surplus as determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10427.1. 

(3) Cause the preparation of new auditor’s records to reflect the adjusted principal amount of the remaining assessment. All subsequent assessment installments shall be based upon the adjusted principal amount of the assessment as reflected in the revised auditor’s record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 966, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

10427.1.

(a) If there is no supplemental assessment, the entire amount of the surplus shall be applied as a credit to the assessment or, as an alternative, any portion of the surplus may be used to call outstanding bonds. If any supplemental assessment has been levied, any portion of the surplus shall be applied as a credit to the assessment or supplemental assessment, or both, or, as an alternative, may be used to call outstanding bonds, as the legislative body may determine. Any credit upon the assessment or any supplemental assessment shall be made in the proportion which each individual assessment, or installment of principal thereof, bears to the total of all individual assessments in the assessment or supplemental assessments upon which the surplus is to be credited. Any bonds called pursuant to this section shall be selected in accordance with Section 8768.

(b) Where an individual assessment, or any installment of the principal thereof, has been paid in cash after January 1, 1991, the credit shall be returned in cash to the person or persons owning the property for which the assessment or installment has been paid upon their furnishing satisfactory evidence of payment. 

(c) Where all or any part of an individual assessment remains unpaid, if the individual assessment is not payable in installments, the credit shall be applied in its entirety upon the individual assessment.

(d) Where all or any part of an individual assessment remains unpaid and is payable in installments, the amount apportioned to each parcel shall be credited against the next installment or installments unpaid upon it after the two-year period specified in this subdivision. When any of the surplus is to be applied as a credit upon the assessment, payable in installments, no credit may be paid or credited as provided in this section until after a period of two years from the date of receipt of proceeds of the sale of bonds by the legal entity conducting the proceedings.

(e) There shall be transferred to the general fund of the city (1) any portion of the surplus which has not been paid to or claimed by the persons entitled thereto within four years from the date of recordation of the assessment and any supplemental assessment or, if bonds have been issued, within four years after the due date of the last installment upon the bonds or of the last principal coupon attached thereto, and (2) any interest earned from the investment of any moneys constituting all or any part of the surplus when the surplus attributable to an individual remaining assessment is fifty dollars ($50) or less. If the surplus attributable to an individual remaining assessment is greater than fifty dollars ($50), any interest earned thereon, less administrative cost of investing and crediting, shall be applied as a credit to the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

10427.2.

If, pursuant to Section 10427, the legislative body determines that any surplus remaining in the improvement fund shall be used as a credit upon the assessment or any supplemental assessment, the legislative body may also determine that such surplus shall be applied as a credit to the city or any local, state or national agency or authority which shall have made a contribution towards the costs and expenses of the improvement. A credit on account of any contribution shall be made in the proportion which such contribution bears to the total amount of the assessment or supplemental assessment prior to the deduction of all such contributions. All such credits shall be returned in cash to the city, local, state or national agency or authority making such contribution. The surplus remaining in the improvement fund after making credits on account of contributions shall then be applied as a credit in the manner provided in Section 10427.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

10427.5.

If any work to be performed under this division is deleted from a specific lot fronting on the improvement, the surplus in the improvement fund resulting from the deletion of such work may be returned to the owner of that lot, in the manner provided in Section 10427.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

10428.

From the date of the recordation pursuant to Sections 3114 and 3115, each special assessment levied under this division is a lien upon the land upon which it is levied. This lien is paramount to all other liens, except prior assessments and taxation. Unless sooner discharged, the lien continues for a period of 10 years from the date of the recordation or, if bonds are issued to represent the assessment, until the expiration of four years after the due date of the last installment on the bonds or of the last principal coupon attached thereto. All persons have constructive notice of this lien from the date of the recordation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

10429.

The lien, whether bonds issued to represent the assessment or otherwise, shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

10430.

The lien of a reassessment and a refunding assessment shall have the same priority as the original assessment to which it relates. A supplemental assessment is a new assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

At any time after the preliminary approval of the report provided for in Section 10300, by resolution adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all its members and without calling for bids, the legislative body may order that the municipality itself execute any or all of the improvement in accordance with the specifications and plans adopted for the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.

The legislative body, on ordering the municipality itself to execute the improvement, may authorize the municipality to employ the labor, and provide the material, appliances, supplies, and illuminating agent necessary to carry out the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.

The cost and expenses of work executed by the municipality itself shall be paid out of the improvement fund, but the amount appropriated and used from the fund for this purpose shall not exceed the amount of the bid upon which the award of the contract was made, or if no bids are received or the work is ordered without asking for bids, the cost and expenses shall not exceed the amount of the estimate provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 10204. If the cost and expenses do exceed the amount of the bid, or of the estimate in case no bids are received or the work is ordered without asking for bids, the excess shall be paid from the general fund in the treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.1. Loan Repayment Assessment Districts [10550. - 10555.]

10550.

(a) If a municipality has entered into a contract with the state that includes a loan funded by the state for the purpose of financing the construction and installation of water or sewer system improvements in or along its streets that are of special benefit to land within the municipality, the municipality may conduct proceedings under this division for the formation of an assessment district for the purpose of levying an assessment to secure repayment of the loan.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the proceeding for the formation of the assessment district and the levy of the assessment shall be conducted in accordance with this division, with appropriate modifications to all resolutions and notices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10555.

The legislative body shall provide in the resolutions required under Sections 10200 and 10312 that the assessment will be collected in annual installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Improvement Bonds [10600. - 10610.]

10600.

The legislative body conducting the proceedings under the provisions of this division may, in its resolution of intention, determine and declare that bonds shall be issued under the provisions of either the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915. In any case, the assessment shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets of the city, county surveyor of the county, or district engineer of the district or public corporation conducting the proceedings in the manner and with like force and effect as provided in the Improvement Act of 1911 and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, and the assessment therefor shall have the priority, and the proceedings shall be subject to all of the curative clauses and powers of reassessment, provided in those acts. In any case, the official in whose office the original of the assessment is recorded shall give the notice to pay the assessments, as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.1.

If provision is made for the issuance of bonds under the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 7000)), all assessments under one hundred fifty dollars ($150) which are not paid within 30 days after recordation of the assessment are delinquent and shall bear interest at the rate of 1 percent per month, the interest to be computed from the date of the bonds. The legislative body may order the collection of any such delinquent assessments pursuant to either Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 5410) or Chapter 18.1 (commencing with Section 5450) of Part 3 of Division 7. All references in those chapters to the contractor, his assignee, his assigns, or his agent shall be deemed to refer to the city. References in Section 5451 to interest from the “date of filing the original assessment” shall be deemed to refer to the “date of the bonds.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.2.

The legislative body conducting the proceedings for the issuance of improvement bonds under this division may require that any bidder submitting a proposal for the purchase of such improvement bonds deposit contemporaneously therewith cash, a certified check, or a cashier’s check, in an amount to be determined by the legislative body, guaranteeing the purchase of such improvement bonds by such bidder in the event that he is awarded the purchase of such improvement bonds by the legislative body.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10600.1 by Stats. 1975, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

10600.5.

When the resolution of intention provides that bonds shall be issued under the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, said bonds may be dated at any time after the expiration of the cash payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

An action to determine the validity of the assessment, bonds, contract, improvement or acquisition may be brought by the legislative body or by the contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. For such purpose an improvement or acquisition shall be deemed to be in existence upon its authorization and an assessment upon its confirmation. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the action authorized by this section shall not be brought by any person other than the legislative body or the contractor, nor except when permitted by Section 10400 shall the action be brought after the date fixed for the beginning of work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1526.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

The bonds may be issued and sold as the legislative body directs. The proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited in the fund specified in Section 10424. The notice in the resolution of intention shall recite a maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, not to exceed 8 percent a year payable semiannually, which rate shall not be exceeded in the issuance of the bonds. All bonds shall be made payable to bearer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.5.

When the resolution of intention provides that bonds shall be issued under the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, and when the assessment has been duly confirmed pursuant to Section 10312, and when the assessment contains an assessment on public property which is subject to assessment pursuant to Section 10206 including, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, public property owned by the city, county or other entity conducting the proceeding, the legislative body may sell such assessment in the same manner and at the same time as provided in Section 10602. The proceeds of the sale shall be deposited in the fund specified in Section 10424.

The buyer of such an assessment shall, upon paying the purchase price, become the owner of the assessment and shall be entitled to exercise all the rights that an owner of an assessment has under Section 5302.5.

If bonds or certificates are to be issued to represent any assessment or assessments against public property, the legislative body of the entity conducting the proceedings may sell such bonds or certificates in the same manner and at the same time as provided in Section 10602. The proceeds of the sale shall be deposited in the fund specified in Section 10424.

The buyer of such bonds and of each individual bond shall become an owner of the assessment and shall be entitled to exercise all of the rights of an owner of an assessment under Section 5302.5 and of a bondholder as provided in Section 5302.6 and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 6468) of Part 5 of Division 7.

The buyer of each certificate shall become the owner of the assessment and shall be entitled to exercise all of the rights of an owner of an assessment under Section 5302.5 and of a certificate holder as provided in Section 6467.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

When the resolution of intention provides for the issuance of bonds, the superintendent of streets of a city, surveyor of a county, or district engineer of a public corporation, conducting the proceedings shall give the notice of recording the assessment, and collect and receive the assessments. The legislative body of the public entity conducting the proceedings may, by resolution, designate the treasurer, tax collector, or other officer of the entity to collect and receive the money. If the entity is a public corporation it may designate the treasurer or tax collector of the county in which it is situated to collect and receive the money. The person so designated shall execute any certificates relating to the amount of assessments paid or remaining unpaid which are required to be executed by the superintendent of streets by the law pursuant to which bonds are to be issued, including, but not limited to, Sections 6420 and 8620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1224.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.1.

In the event the city conducting the proceedings designates the county treasurer or tax collector to perform any service relating to collecting and receiving the money, including but not limited to, printing, servicing, or collecting any bonds, neither the treasurer nor the tax collector so designated shall perform any such service until there shall have been paid to him his estimate of the cost of the service or services, provided, however, the city conducting the proceedings, in lieu of the prior payment of the estimated cost, may enter into a written agreement with the county treasurer or tax collector. Such agreement shall provide for the payment of the cost or estimated cost of any service rendered by the designated county officer.

In the event such cost of estimated cost is not included in the assessment, the city conducting the proceedings shall be liable for payment thereof from the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 777.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

The person who is to collect and receive the assessments before the issuance of bonds may be bonded in favor of the entity conducting the proceedings in an amount to be fixed and such bond approved by the legislative body of the entity. When he is a bonded official his services in receiving the money are a duty imposed upon him by law within the purview of his bond. In the case of a county official collecting for a public corporation, the county shall collect any money due on the bond as agent for the public corporation. If the legislative body designating the bonded person finds that his official bond is inadequate it may provide that he shall be separately bonded. The premium of such bond shall be an incidental expense of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.

The person collecting the assessments shall deposit the amounts received in the construction fund of the entity conducting the proceedings, not less than once each week, or at such other more frequent intervals as the legislative body of the entity determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.

The legislative body may, in its resolution of intention, determine and declare that bonds will be issued and paid, and the assessments therefor levied, collected, and augmented in accordance with the applicable provisions of Sections 14, 15, 16, 17, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 27, and 28 of the Refunding Assessment Bond Act of 1935, in which case the applicable provisions of that act are incorporated in this division as if fully set out herein. If the bonds are issued pursuant to that act, appropriate changes shall be made in the form of the bonds to show that they are for a public improvement or acquisition under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.

The list of unpaid assessments shall be filed, the bonds ordered issued, interest shall accrue from the date, and assessments thereafter paid before maturity, bonds called, premium paid, and illegal assessments and bonds reassessed, all as provided in the Improvement Bond Act of 1915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.

The bond shall be entitled “Improvement Bond.” The provisions for payment of the bond before maturity, as contained in the bond form in the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, shall be inserted in the place of the similar provision in the bond form of the Refunding Assessment Bond Act of 1935. There shall also be inserted in the bond form after the title of the refunding act the words “as modified in the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.

In all cases where bonds are to be issued under any of the bond acts referred to in this chapter the proceedings shall be subject to all of the curative clauses, limitation of actions, and powers of reassessment provided in all of those acts, and the publication of the notice of improvement shall be deemed to be the publication of the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10610.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings under this division leading up to such issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Deferral of Assessments [10700. - 10706.]

10700.

Notwithstanding any other law, the legislative body may determine, by resolution, to allow landowners to defer payment of their assessments pursuant to this chapter. This chapter may be used only if 80 percent or more of the area of the assessment district is developed for residential, commercial, or industrial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

The legislative body may determine criteria that property owners must meet to qualify for deferral, and may determine procedures to ensure that the criteria are satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

No deferral arrangement may restrict, reduce, or eliminate any remedy of a bondholder provided by this division in the event of a default.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

Deferral may be provided through a year-to-year agreement between the city and an eligible property owner, which provides that the city will make assessment payments on behalf of the property owner for that year. No agreement shall commit the city to make deferral payments beyond one year. No agreement of this type shall be construed as a debt of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

Alternatively, the city may create a deferral fund for the assessment district, and deposit into the deferral fund an amount sufficient to pay the asessments being deferred for a specified period of time. Funds in the deferral fund may be invested as other city funds are invested, or in more restricted ways as determined by the legislative body. Any investment of the funds in the deferral fund shall comply with federal arbitrage rules.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

A city may increase the principal amount of bonds issued under this division by an amount sufficient to fund a program pursuant to this chapter. The proceeds of bonds issued for this purpose shall be placed in the deferral fund created pursuant to Section 10704, and may be used for no other purpose than financing deferrals. The proceeds may be invested in interest-bearing securities of the federal government with maturities occurring on or before the maturity of the bonds issued pursuant to this section. Any investment of those bond proceeds shall comply with federal arbitrage rules (26 U.S.C. Sec. 103 and the rules adopted pursuant thereto).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.

The amount of any deferred assessments, including interest at a rate determined by the legislative body, shall be due and payable whenever the parcel of property upon which the assessment was levied is transferred, or at the time of last maturity of the bonds issued for the improvement pursuant to this division, or at other times as determined by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. PEDESTRIAN MALLS [11000. - 11806.]



PART 1. PEDESTRIAN MALL LAW OF 1960 [11000. - 11806.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [11000. - 11011.]

11000.

This part may be cited as the Pedestrian Mall Law of 1960.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

“City” includes every county, city, and city and county within this State. “The city” means the particular county, city, or city and county, acting pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

“Legislative body” means the legislative body of “the city.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

“Street” as used in the definitions of the terms “city streets,” “mall intersection” and “intersecting streets” hereinafter defined means any public street, road, highway, alley, lane, court, way or place of any nature open to the use of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

“City street,” as used with regard to streets located within a city or city and county, means any “street” located within the city or city and county, except a “freeway,” “state highway,” or “county highway” as defined in Sections 23.5, 24, and 25. “City street,” as used with regard to streets located within a county, means any “street” located within the county, except a “freeway” or “state highway,” as defined in Sections 23.5 and 24.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

“Pedestrian mall” means one or more “city streets,” or portions thereof, on which vehicular traffic is or is to be restricted in whole or in part and which is or is to be used exclusively or primarily for pedestrian travel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11007.

“Mall intersection” means any intersection of a “city street” constituting a part of a “pedestrian mall” with any “street,” which intersection is itself part of the “pedestrian mall.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.

“Intersecting street” means any “street” which meets or crosses a “pedestrian mall” at a “mall intersection” but includes only those portions thereof on either side of a “mall intersection” which lie between the “mall intersection” and the first intersection of the “intersecting street” with a public street or highway open to vehicular traffic. If any portion of a “pedestrian mall” terminates on a “street” at a place thereon other than a place of intersection with a public street or highway open to vehicular traffic, “intersecting street” also includes that portion of any “street” which lies between such place of termination and the first intersection of such “street” with a public street or highway open to vehicular traffic. “Intersecting street” shall also include any other “street” or portion thereof which the legislative body, in its resolution adopted pursuant to Section 11200, declares to be such.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11009.

“Assessment roll” means the assessment roll or rolls used by the city for purposes of city ad valorem taxes on real property of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11010.

If “the city” is a charter city, “similar special assessment law” shall include a procedural assessment ordinance of such city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.

“Vehicle Parking District Law of 1943” means the Vehicle Parking District Law of 1943, Part 1 (commencing with Section 31500) of Division 18 of the Streets and Highways Code, as that statute existed on December 31, 1973.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 400, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Purpose and Powers [11100. - 11103.]

11100.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that in certain areas in cities and particularly in retail shopping areas thereof, there is need to separate pedestrian travel from vehicular travel and that such separation is necessary to protect the public safety or otherwise to serve the public interest and convenience. The Legislature further finds and declares that such objective can, in part, be accomplished by the establishment of pedestrian malls pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

The legislative body of a city shall have the power:

(a) To establish pedestrian malls.

(b) To prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on a pedestrian mall. 

(c) To pay, from general funds of the city or other available moneys or from the proceeds of assessments levied on lands benefited by the establishment of a pedestrian mall, the damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of a pedestrian mall. No money available for expenditure within the city from the proceeds of any tax, license or fee imposed by any public agency upon the ownership or operation of vehicles or the fuel used therein shall be used to pay such damages, except as may be permitted by Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) To construct on city streets which have been or will be established as a pedestrian mall improvements of any kind or nature necessary or convenient to the operation of such city streets as a pedestrian mall, including but not limited to, paving, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, sewers, drainage works, street lighting facilities, fire protection facilities, flood protection facilities, water distribution facilities, vehicular parking areas, retaining walls, landscaping, tree planting, statuary, fountains, decorative structures, benches, restrooms, child care facilities, display facilities, information booths, public assembly facilities, any improvements necessary or convenient for a covered air-conditioned mall, and other structures, works or improvements necessary or convenient to serve members of the public using such pedestrian mall, including the reconstruction or relocation of existing city-owned works, improvements or facilities on such city streets. The foregoing, or any portions thereof, are sometimes in this part referred to as “improvements.”

(e) To pay, from general funds of the city or other available moneys or from the proceeds of assessments levied on property benefited by any such improvements, the whole or any portion of the cost of such improvements. No money available for expenditure within the city from the proceeds of any tax, license or fee imposed by any public agency upon the ownership or operation of vehicles or the fuel used therein shall be used to pay such cost or expense, except as may be permitted by Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) To do any and all other acts or things necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 178.)